Hawaii statutes.
§236E-3 Conformance to the Internal Revenue
Code; general application. For all decedents dying after December 31,
2015, as used in this chapter, "Internal Revenue Code" means subtitle
B of the federal Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended as of December 31, 2015,
as it applies to the determination of gross estate, adjusted gross estate,
federal taxable estate, and generation-skipping transfers, except those
provisions of the Internal Revenue Code and federal public laws that, pursuant
to this chapter, do not apply or are otherwise limited in application. [L 2012, c 220, pt of §1; am L 2013, c 45, §2; am L
2014, c 44, §2; am L 2015, c 23, §2; am L 2016, c 33, §3]

Note

The 2016 amendment applies to decedents dying or taxable
transfers occurring after December 31, 2015. L 2016, c 33, §5(2).

Previous
Vol04_Ch0201-0257
Next